engine/dictionaries/cs_CZ/cs_CZ.aff
SFX U Y 69
SFX U   ec          ce         ec
SFX U   ec          ci         ec
SFX U   ec          če         ec
SFX U   ec          cem        ec
SFX U   ec          ců         ec
SFX U   ec          cům        ec
SFX U   ec          cích       ec
SFX U   ec          cův/Y      ec
SFX U   0           e          [^e]c
SFX U   0           i          [^e]c
SFX U   0           em         [^e]c
SFX U   0           ů          [^e]c
SFX U   0           ům         [^e]c
SFX U   0           ích        [^e]c
SFX U   0           ův/Y       [^e]c
SFX U   0           e          [^acďeňť]
SFX U   0           i          [^acďeňťi]
SFX U   0           ovi        [^acďeňť]
SFX U   0           em         [^acďeňť]
SFX U   0           ů          [^aceň]
SFX U   0           ům         [^aceň]
SFX U   0           ích        [^acďeňťsx]
SFX U   0           ech        [sx]
SFX U   0           y          x
SFX U   0           ův/Y       [^caňe]
SFX U   a           e          a
SFX U   a           ovi        a
SFX U   a           em         a
SFX U   a           ové        a
SFX U   a           ů          a
SFX U   a           ům         a
SFX U   a           i          a
SFX U   a           ích        a
SFX U   a           ův/Y       a
SFX U   ď           dě         ď
SFX U   ď           di         ď
SFX U   ď           děm        ď
SFX U   ď           dích       ď
SFX U   ň           ně         leň
SFX U   ň           ni         leň
SFX U   ň           něm        leň
SFX U   0           ů          leň
SFX U   0           ům         leň
SFX U   ň           ních       leň
SFX U   0           ův/Y       leň
SFX U   eň          ně         [^l]eň
SFX U   eň          ni         [^l]eň
SFX U   eň          něm        [^l]eň
SFX U   eň          ňů         [^l]eň
SFX U   eň          ňům        [^l]eň
SFX U   eň          ních       [^l]eň
SFX U   eň          ňův/Y      [^l]eň
SFX U   ň           ně         [^e]ň
SFX U   ň           ni         [^e]ň
SFX U   ň           něm        [^e]ň
SFX U   0           ů          [^e]ň
SFX U   0           ům         [^e]ň
SFX U   ň           ních       [^e]ň
SFX U   0           ův/Y       [^e]ň
SFX U   ť           tě         ť
SFX U   ť           ti         ť
SFX U   ť           těm        ť
SFX U   ť           tích       ť
SFX U   e           i          e
SFX U   0           m          e
SFX U   e           ů          e
SFX U   e           ům         e
SFX U   e           ích        e
SFX U   e           ův/Y       e

SFX D Y 68
SFX D   es          a          es
SFX D   es          u          es
SFX D   es          ovi        es
SFX D   es          e          [^ghk]es
SFX D   es          em         es
SFX D   es          ové        es
SFX D   es          ů          es
SFX D   es          ům         es
SFX D   es          ech        [^ighk]es
SFX D   es          y          [^i]es
SFX D   es          ích        ies
SFX D   es          ách        kes
SFX D   es          i          ies
SFX D   és          a          és
SFX D   és          u          és
SFX D   és          ovi        és
SFX D   és          e          [^ghk]és
SFX D   és          em         és
SFX D   és          ové        és
SFX D   és          ů          és
SFX D   és          ům         és
SFX D   és          ech        [^ighk]és
SFX D   és          y          [^i]és
SFX D   és          ích        iés
SFX D   és          ách        kés
SFX D   és          i          iés
SFX D   os          a          os
SFX D   os          u          os
SFX D   os          ovi        os
SFX D   os          e          [^ghk]os
SFX D   os          em         os
SFX D   os          ové        os
SFX D   os          ů          os
SFX D   os          ům         os
SFX D   os          ech        [^ighk]os
SFX D   os          y          [^i]os
SFX D   os          ích        ios
SFX D   os          ách        kos
SFX D   os          i          ios
SFX D   us          a          us
SFX D   us          u          us
SFX D   us          ovi        us
SFX D   us          e          [^ghk]us
SFX D   us          em         us
SFX D   us          ové        us
SFX D   us          ů          us
SFX D   us          ům         us
SFX D   us          ech        [^eik]us
SFX D   us          y          [^ei]us
SFX D   us          ích        [ei]us
SFX D   us          ách        kus
SFX D   us          i          [ei]us
SFX D   0           é          [^eou]s
SFX D   0           é          [^asy]
SFX D   a           é          a
SFX D   ky          ek         [aeiouyáéíóúůýě][lr]ky
SFX D   y           0          [^aeiouyáéíóúůýě][lr]ky
SFX D   ky          ek         [čdntv]ky
SFX D   y           0          [^čdntvrl]ky
SFX D   ly          el         [dkpz]ly
SFX D   y           0          [^dkpz]ly
SFX D   y           0          [^kl]y
SFX D   y           ům         y
SFX D   y           ách        [gh]y
SFX D   y           ách        ky
SFX D   y           ách        ry
SFX D   y           ech        [^ghkr]y
SFX D   y           ích        [sz]y

SFX H Y 24
SFX H   0           u          [^ey]
SFX H   0           e          [^eyghkc]
SFX H   0           em         [^ey]
SFX H   0           y          [^ey]
SFX H   0           ů          [^ey]
SFX H   0           ům         [^ey]
SFX H   0           ech        [^eyghk]
SFX H   g           zích       g
SFX H   h           zích       [^c]h
SFX H   ch          ších       ch
SFX H   k           cích       k
SFX H   e           u          e
SFX H   0           m          e
SFX H   e           y          e
SFX H   e           ů          e
SFX H   e           ům         e
SFX H   e           ech        e
SFX H   y           ů          y
SFX H   y           ům         y
SFX H   y           ech        [^ghk]y
SFX H   gy          zích       gy
SFX H   hy          zích       [^c]hy
SFX H   chy         ších       chy
SFX H   ky          cích       ky

SFX L Y 55
SFX L   0           a          [^nk]
SFX L   0           u          [^nk]
SFX L   0           e          [^kn]
SFX L   k           ce         yk
SFX L   0           ě          [bdfmptvw]
SFX L   0           em         [^nk]
SFX L   0           y          [^nk]
SFX L   0           ů          [^nk]
SFX L   0           ům         [^nk]
SFX L   0           ech        [bdflmprtvz]
SFX L   0           ách        [gh]
SFX L   g           zích       g
SFX L   h           zích       [^c]h
SFX L   ch          ších       ch
SFX L   0           ích        [cčjřsšž]
SFX L   ek          ka         ek
SFX L   ek          ku         ek
SFX L   ek          kem        ek
SFX L   ek          ky         ek
SFX L   ek          ků         ek
SFX L   ek          kům        ek
SFX L   ek          cích       ek
SFX L   ek          kách       íček
SFX L   0           a          [^e]k
SFX L   0           u          [^e]k
SFX L   0           em         [^e]k
SFX L   0           y          [^e]k
SFX L   0           ů          [^e]k
SFX L   0           ům         [^e]k
SFX L   k           cích       [^e]k
SFX L   0           a          men
SFX L   0           u          men
SFX L   0           e          men
SFX L   0           em         men
SFX L   0           y          men
SFX L   0           ů          men
SFX L   0           ům         men
SFX L   0           ech        men
SFX L   en          na         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nu         [^m]en
SFX L   en          ne         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nem        [^m]en
SFX L   en          ny         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nů         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nům        [^m]en
SFX L   en          nech       [^m]en
SFX L   0           a          [^e]n
SFX L   0           u          [^e]n
SFX L   0           e          [^e]n
SFX L   0           ě          [áéíý]n
SFX L   0           em         [^e]n
SFX L   0           y          [^e]n
SFX L   0           ů          [^e]n
SFX L   0           ům         [^e]n
SFX L   0           ech        [^e]n
